Utah statutes.
65A-4-1.   Acquisition and disposition of land by state agencies.
(1)  All state agencies may acquire land by gift, devise, bequest, exchange,
compensation for public resource value loss, or in satisfaction of a debt and
are authorized to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of land no longer needed
for public purposes, unless otherwise provided by law.
(2)  The proceeds from the sale, lease, or other disposition of land shall go
to the state agency using or holding the land unless:
(a)  the governor or the Legislature order its deposit in the fund from which
the state agency receives its appropriations; or
(b)  the use or disposition of the proceeds is specified elsewhere in law.
